District of Columbia statutes.
38-1208.06

Funding.

There is authorized to be appropriated from the general revenues of the District of Columbia funds necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VIII, § 806
as added Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2202, 49 DCR 6968